Hawaii statutes.
[§440E-27] Revocation; suspension.
(a) In addition to any other acts or conditions provided by law, the director
may refuse to renew, reinstate, or restore or may deny, revoke, suspend, fine,
reprimand, or condition in any manner, the license of any person or entity
issued for this chapter, for any cause authorized by law, including but not
limited to the following:

(1) Violation of any provision of this chapter or the
rules adopted by the director, or any other law or rule that applies to those
persons licensed under this chapter;

(2) Manifest incapacity, professional misconduct, or
unethical conduct;

(3) Making any false representations or promises
through advertising or other dissemination of information;

(4) Any fraudulent, dishonest, or deceitful act in
connection with the licensing of any promoter under this chapter or in
connection with any mixed martial arts contest;

(5) Making any false or misleading statement in any
application or document submitted or required to be filed under this chapter;

(6) Revocation or suspension of a license or other
disciplinary action against the licensee by any other regulatory entity over
mixed martial arts contests;

(7) Failure to report any disciplinary action,
including medical and mandatory suspensions, or revocation or suspension of a
license in another jurisdiction not less than fifteen calendar days preceding
any mixed martial arts match in which the licensee participates or within
thirty calendar days following the disciplinary decision, whichever is earlier;
or

(8) Participation in any sham or false mixed martial
arts contest.

(b) A manager may be held responsible for all
violations of this chapter by a mixed martial arts contestant whom the manager
manages and may be subject to license revocation or suspension, or a fine, or
any combination thereof, irrespective of whether any disciplinary action is
taken against the mixed martial arts contestant. [L 2007, c 279, pt of §1]

Previous
Vol10_Ch0436-0474
Next